Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Protection of Condominium Purchasers

381.9201.
Applicability of KRS 381.9201, 381.9205, and 381.9207 — Modification or
waiver by agreement — Certificate not required in certain cases.

This section and KRS

381.9205

and

381.9207

apply to all units subject to KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or as modified or waived by agreement of purchasers of units in a condominium in which all units are restricted to nonresidential use.

The certificate referred to in KRS

381.9203

shall not be required in the case of:

A gratuitous disposition of a unit;

A disposition pursuant to court order;

A disposition by a government or governmental agency;

A disposition by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

A disposition to a person in the business of selling real estate who intends to offer those units to purchasers, and where the purchaser has modified or waived the requirements of KRS

381.9203

by agreement; or

A disposition that may be canceled at any time and for any reason by the purchaser without penalty.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 51, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 9, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9203.
Documentation to be furnished by seller of unit — Certificate.

Except as provided in KRS 381.9201(2), a seller of a unit shall furnish to a purchaser or purchaser’s agent before execution of any contract for sale of a unit, or otherwise before conveyance, a copy of the declaration, other than the plats and plans, and a copy of the bylaws, the rules or regulations of the association, and a certificate, current to the date of issuance and signed and dated by the association’s manager or authorized agent, containing:

A statement disclosing the effect on the proposed disposition of any right of first refusal or other restraint on the free alienability of the unit;

A statement setting forth the amount of the monthly common expense assessment and any unpaid common expense, emergency assessment, or special assessment currently due and payable from the selling unit owner;

A statement of any other fees payable by unit owners;

A statement of any capital expenditures anticipated by the association for the current and, if known, next two (2) fiscal years;

A statement of the amount of any reserves for capital expenditures, if any, and of any portions of those reserves designated by the association for any specified projects;

The most recent regularly prepared balance sheet and income and expense statement, if any, of the association;

The current operating budget of the association;

The date of the most current financial report prepared for the association pursuant to KRS

381.9197

;

A statement of any unsatisfied judgments against the association, the status of any pending suits in which the association is a defendant, or any pending suits in which the association is a named party and the amount in dispute or contest is more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

A statement describing any insurance coverage maintained by the association or an attachment of a certificate of insurance issued to the association; and

If any portion of the condominium is situated upon a leasehold estate, a statement of the remaining term of any leasehold estate affecting the condominium and the provisions governing any extension or renewal thereof.

The association shall, within ten (10) days after receipt of a written request by a unit owner, furnish a certificate containing the information necessary to enable the unit owner to comply with subsection (1) of this section. A unit owner or unit owner’s agent providing a purchaser with the certificate issued pursuant to this subsection shall not be liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information provided by the association and included in the certificate.

A unit owner or unit owner’s agent shall not be liable to a purchaser for the failure or delay of the association to provide the certificate in a timely manner, but the sales contract is voidable by the purchaser until the certificate has been provided and for five (5) days thereafter or until conveyance, whichever first occurs.

An association may not deny the validity of any statement in the certificate.

Failure to provide a certificate does not void a deed to a purchaser.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 52, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 10, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9205.
Release of liens.

Before conveying real estate to the association, the declarant shall have that real estate released from all liens, the foreclosure of which would deprive unit owners of any right of access to or easement of support of their units.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 53, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9207.
Declarant’s obligation to complete and restore.

The declarant shall complete all improvements labeled “MUST BE BUILT” on plats or plans prepared pursuant to KRS

381.9141

.

The declarant is subject to liability for the prompt repair and restoration, to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium, of any portion of the condominium affected by the exercise of rights reserved or created by KRS

381.9143

,

381.9145

,

381.9147

,

381.9149

, and

381.9153

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 54, effective January 1, 2011.